District of Columbia statutes.
16-3740

Judgment for defendant and determination of damages

Repealed.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 564, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(o)(1)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 16-3731 to 16-3740.